North Carolina statutes. Chapter 110. Child Welfare.
Article 8. Child Abuse and Neglect. [Repealed]

§§ 110-115 through 110-123.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 815, s. 2.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to the screening of abuse and neglect complaints, see now

G.S. 7B-300

through 7B-311.

§§ 110-124 through 110-127.

Reserved for future codification purposes.